Utah statutes.
59-2-1220.   Extension of time for filing claim -- County authority to make refunds.

(1) The commission or a county may extend the time for filing a claim until December 31 of the year the claim is required to be filed, if the commission or county finds that good cause exists to extend the deadline.

(2) (a)  For purposes of this Subsection (2):

(i)  "Abatement" means the amount of property taxes accrued that constitutes a tax abatement for the poor in accordance with Subsection 59-2-1202(7).

(ii)  "Credit" means a homeowner's credit or renter's credit authorized by this part.

(iii)  "Property taxes due" means the taxes due on a claimant's property:

(A)  for which an abatement or a credit is granted by a county or the commission; and

(B)  for the calendar year for which the abatement or credit is granted.

(iv)  "Property taxes paid" is an amount equal to the sum of:

(A)  the amount of the property taxes the claimant paid for the taxable year for which the claimant is applying for the abatement or credit; and

(B)  the amount of the abatement or credit the county or the commission grants.

(b)  A county or the commission granting an abatement or a credit to a claimant shall refund to that claimant an amount equal to the amount by which the claimant's property taxes paid exceed the claimant's property taxes due, if that amount is $1 or more.



Amended by Chapter 221, 2001 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 310, 2001 General Session

